Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 162.135 is amended to read:
162.135. As used in ORS 162.135 to 162.205, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1)(a) “Contraband” means:
(A) Controlled substances as defined in ORS 475.005;
(B) Drug paraphernalia as defined in ORS 475.525;
(C) Except as otherwise  provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, currency possessed by or
in the control of [ an adult in custody ] a person  confined in a correctional facility; or
(D) Any article or thing which a person confined in a correctional facility, youth correction fa-
cility or state hospital is prohibited by  statute, rule or order from obtaining or possessing, and
whose use would endanger the safety or security of such institution or any person therein.
(b) “Contraband” does not include  authorized currency possessed by [ an adult in custody ] a
person confined in a work release facility.
(2) “Correctional facility” means any place used for the confinement  of persons charged with
or convicted of a crime or otherwise confined under a  court order and includes but is not limited
to a youth correction  facility. “Correctional facility” applies to a state hospital or a secure intensive
community inpatient facility only as to persons detained therein charged with or convicted of  a
crime, or detained therein after having been found guilty except for insanity of  a crime under ORS
161.290 to 161.373.
(3) “Currency” means paper money and coins that are within the correctional institution.
(4) “Custody” means the imposition of  actual or constructive restraint by a peace officer  or a
parole and probation officer as defined in ORS 181A.355,  pursuant to  an arrest or court order,
but does not include detention in a correctional  facility, youth correction facility or a state hospital.
(5) “Escape” means the unlawful departure of a person from custody or a correctional  facility.
“Escape” includes the unauthorized departure  or absence from this state or failure to return to this
state by a person who is under the jurisdiction of the  Psychiatric Security Review Board under ORS
161.315 to 161.351. “Escape” does not include failure to  comply with provisions of a conditional re-
lease in ORS 135.245.
(6) “Youth correction facility” means:
(a) A youth correction facility as defined in ORS 420.005; and
(b) A detention facility as defined in ORS 419A.004.
Enrolled House Bill 2465 (HB 2465-A) Page 1
(7) “State hospital” means the Oregon State Hospital and any other hospital established  by law
for similar purposes.
(8) “Unauthorized departure” means the unauthorized departure of  a person confined by court
order in a youth correction facility  or a state hospital that, because of the nature of the court order,
is not a correctional  facility as defined in this section, or the failure to return to [ custody] con-
finement after any form of temporary release or transitional leave from a correctional facility.
SECTION 2.  ORS 807.115, as amended by section 4, chapter 63, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
807.115. (1) The Department of Transportation shall retain a digital  image of each photograph
and signature shown on a driver license under the provisions of ORS  807.110 or an identification
card under ORS 807.400.
(2) The digital images of photographs may  not be made available to anyone other than law
enforcement officials , parole and probation officers  and employees of the department  acting in an
official  capacity.
(3) As used in this section[ ,]:
(a) “Law enforcement official” includes a humane special agent as defined in ORS 181A.345.
(b) “Parole and probation officer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 181A.355.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 807.115 by  section 2 of this 2025 Act become oper-
ative on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House March 11, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2465 (HB 2465-A) Page 2